apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="/з__pr">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>з</l><r>з<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>са</l><r>з<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>з</l><r>з<s n="pr"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>з</l><r>з<s n="pr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>са</l><r>з<s n="pr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>з</l><r>з<s n="pr"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>з</l><r>з<s n="pr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>са</l><r>з<s n="pr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>з</l><r>з<s n="pr"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Declension classes -->


    <pardef n="BASE__малад/ы">
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ая</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ую</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ыя</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ых</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ых</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ыя</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ых</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ымі</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__хутк/і">
      <e><p><l>і</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>і</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ім</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ім</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ая</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ую</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ім</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ім</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ія</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іх</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ім</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іх</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ія</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іх</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>імі</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__хутк/ага">
      <e><p><l>ага</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ага</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>аму</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ай</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ай</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ай</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ай</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ае</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ае</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>аму</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ага</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ага</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__шчаслів/ы">
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ая</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ую</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ыя</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ых</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ым</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ых</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ыя</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ых</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ымі</l><r><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__шчаслів/ага">
      <e><p><l>ага</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ага</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>аму</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ай</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ай</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ай</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ай</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ае</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ае</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>аму</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ага</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ага</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BASE__малад/ога">
      <e><p><l>ога</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ому</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ога</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ой</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ой</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ой</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ой</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ое</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ому</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ога</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ое</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="з"><i></i><par n="/з__pr"/></e>
